tr: Oyuncak çizim tableti yazı/çizim aracı: Tebeşir/keçeli kalem; Parmak/dokunmatik; Manyetik kalem; Tükenmez kalem tarzı ekran kalemi; Bağlı ekran kalemi; Bağsız ekran kalemi; Su kalemi/fırçası; Diğer
cs: Nástroj k psaní/kreslení na kreslicí tabulce: Křída/fixa; Prst/dotyk; Magnetický stylus; Stylus ve tvaru pera; Připevněný stylus; Nepřipevněný stylus; Vodní pero / štětec; Jiné
vi: Bảng vẽ đồ chơi, dụng cụ viết/vẽ.: Phấn/bút dạ; Ngón tay/cảm ứng; Bút cảm ứng từ tính; Bút cảm ứng dạng bút bi; Bút cảm ứng có dây buộc; Bút cảm ứng không có dây buộc; Bút/cọ nước; Khác
th: อุปกรณ์เขียน/วาดภาพสำหรับของเล่น: ชอล์ก/มาร์กเกอร์; นิ้ว/สัมผัส; สไตลัสแม่เหล็ก; สไตลัสแบบปากกา; สไตลัสแบบมีสายคล้อง; สไตลัสแบบไม่มีสายคล้อง; ปากกา/พู่กันน้ำ; อื่นๆ
pl: Przyrząd do pisania/rysowania na zabawkowym tablecie do rysowania: Kreda/pisak; Palec/dotyk; Rysik magnetyczny; Rysik w kształcie długopisu; Rysik na sznurku; Rysik bez sznurka; Pisak/pędzel na wodę; Inne
fi: Lelupiirtotabletin kirjoitus-/piirtoväline: Liitu/tussi; Sormi/kosketus; Magneettikynä; Kynän mallinen kosketusnäyttökynä; Kiinnitetty kynä; Kiinnittämätön kynä; Vesikynä/-sivellin; Muu
en: Toy drawing tablet writing/drawing instrument: Chalk/marker; Finger/touch; Magnetic stylus; Pen-style stylus; Tethered stylus; Untethered stylus; Water pen/brush; Other
zh-TW: 玩具畫板書寫/繪畫工具: 粉筆/麥克筆; 手指/觸控; 磁性觸控筆; 筆型觸控筆; 附繫繩的觸控筆; 無繫繩的觸控筆; 水筆/畫筆; 其他
ro-RO: Instrument de scris/desenat pentru tableta de desen de jucărie: Cretă/marker; Deget/atingere; Stylus magnetic; Stylus tip stilou; Stylus cu șnur; Stylus fără șnur; Stilou/pensulă cu apă; Altele
hu: Játékrajztábla író/rajzeszköz: Kréta/filctoll; Ujj/érintés; Mágneses érintőceruza; Toll stílusú érintőceruza; Rögzített érintőceruza; Nem rögzített érintőceruza; Vizes toll/ecset; Egyéb
sl-SI: Instrument za pisanje/risanje na otroško risalno tablico: Kreda/marker; Prst/dotik; Magnetno pisalo; Pisalo v obliki svinčnika; Privezano pisalo; Neprivezano pisalo; Vodno pisalo/čopič; Drugo
lt-LT: Žaislinės piešimo planšetės rašymo / piešimo priemonė: Kreida / žymeklis; Pirštu / lietimu; Magnetinis rašiklis; Pieštuko formos rašiklis; Pritvirtintas rašiklis; Nepritvirtintas rašiklis; Vandens rašiklis / teptukas; Kita
ru: Инструмент для письма и рисования на игрушечном планшете: Мел/маркер; Палец/сенсор; Магнитный стилус; Стилус в виде ручки; Стилус на шнурке; Стилус без шнурка; Водяной маркер/кисть; Другое
bg-BG: Инструмент за писане/рисуване на детски таблет за рисуване: Тебешир/маркер; Пръст/докосване; Магнитен стилус; Стилус тип химикалка; Свързан стилус; Свободен стилус; Водна писалка/четка; Друго
nl: Speelgoedtekentablet schrijf-/tekeninstrument: Krijt/stift; Vinger/aanraking; Magnetische stylus; Stylus in penvorm; Vastgemaakte stylus; Losse stylus; Waterpen/-kwast; Overig
ja: おもちゃの描画タブレット筆記／描画ツール: チョーク / マーカー; 指 / タッチ; マグネットスタイラス; ペンスタイルスタイラス; テザー付きスタイラス; テザーなしスタイラス; 水ペン / ブラシ; その他
de: Schreib-/Zeichenwerkzeug des Spielzeug-Zeichentabletts: Kreide/Marker; Finger/Touch; Magnetischer Eingabestift; Stiftartiger Eingabestift; Befestigter Eingabestift; Unbefestigter Eingabestift; Wasserstift/-pinsel; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 玩具绘图板书写/绘画工具: 粉笔/马克笔; 手指/触摸; 磁性手写笔; 笔式手写笔; 带绳手写笔; 无绳手写笔; 水笔/水刷; 其他
pt-PT: Instrumento de escrita/desenho do tablet de desenho de brinquedo: Giz/marcador; Dedo/toque; Caneta digital magnética; Caneta digital estilo esferográfica; Caneta digital com fio; Caneta digital sem fio; Caneta/pincel de água; Outro
el: Μέσο γραφής/σχεδίασης σε παιχνίδι ταμπλέτα σχεδίασης: Κιμωλία/μαρκαδόρος; Δάχτυλο/αφή; Μαγνητική γραφίδα; Γραφίδα τύπου στιλό; Γραφίδα με κορδόνι; Γραφίδα χωρίς κορδόνι; Στιλό/πινέλο νερού; Άλλο
da: Skrive-/tegneinstrument til legetøjstegnetablet: Kridt/tusch; Finger/berøring; Magnetisk stylus; Stylus i pen-stil; Fastbundet stylus; Løs stylus; Vandpen/-pensel; Andet
sv: Leksaksritplatta – skriv-/ritinstrument: Krita/tuschpenna; Finger/beröring; Magnetisk pekpenna; Pennliknande pekpenna; Fastbunden pekpenna; Lös pekpenna; Vattenpenna/-pensel; Övrigt
sk-SK: Hračkársky kresliaci tablet, písací/kresliaci nástroj: Krieda/fixka; Prst/dotyk; Magnetický stylus; Stylus v tvare pera; Stylus na šnúrke; Voľný stylus; Vodné pero/štetec; Iné
nb: Leketegnebrett – skrive-/tegneinstrument: Kritt/tusj; Finger/berøring; Magnetisk pekepenn; Penneformet pekepenn; Festet pekepenn; Løs pekepenn; Vannpenn/-pensel; Annet
ko: 장난감 드로잉 태블릿 필기/그리기 도구: 분필/마커; 손가락/터치; 마그네틱 스타일러스; 펜 스타일 스타일러스; 테더링 스타일러스; 분리형 스타일러스; 워터 펜/브러시; 기타
it: Strumento per scrivere/disegnare della tavoletta da disegno giocattolo: Gesso/pennarello; Dito/tocco; Pennino magnetico; Pennino a penna; Pennino con filo; Pennino senza filo; Penna/pennello ad acqua; Altro
es: Instrumento de escritura/dibujo de la tableta de dibujo de juguete: Tiza/marcador; Dedo/tacto; Lápiz táctil magnético; Lápiz táctil estilo bolígrafo; Lápiz táctil con cable; Lápiz táctil sin cable; Bolígrafo/pincel de agua; Otro
fr: Instrument d’écriture ou de dessin de la tablette à dessin jouet: Craie/marqueur; Doigt/toucher; Stylet magnétique; Stylet type stylo; Stylet attaché; Stylet non attaché; Stylo/pinceau à eau; Autre
hr-HR: Instrument za za pisanje/crtanje na igrački-ploči za crtanje: Kreda/flomaster; Prst/dodir; Magnetski stilus; Stilus u obliku olovke; Privezani stilus; Neprivezani stilus; Vodena olovka / kist; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tablet de desenho de brinquedo instrumento de escrita/desenho: Giz/marcador; Dedo/toque; Caneta magnética; Caneta stylus estilo caneta; Caneta stylus conectada; Caneta stylus avulsa; Caneta/pincel de água; Outros